Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB612.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 3(a) and (b) and 7(a) of the act of October 9, 2008 (P.L.1408, No.113), known as the Scrap Material Theft Prevention Act, are amended and the sections are amended by adding subsections to read:Section 3. Identification requirements for sale of scrap materials to scrap processors and recycling facility operators.(a) General rule.--A scrap processor and recycling facility operator shall collect the following information for all 1234567891011121314151617181920 transactions by a seller of restricted material under section 5 and from any other seller when the purchase of scrap material from the seller exceeds $100 or the scrap material bears a name or mark under 54 Pa.C.S. Ch. 15 (relating to reusable marked articles and receptacles):(1) A photocopy of the driver's license of the seller.(2) The seller's and buyer's signature for each transaction.(3) The license plate number of the motor vehicle the seller operates at the time of the transaction.(4) Written permission of the seller's parent or legal guardian, if the seller is under 18 years of age.(5) The date and time of the transaction.(6) A description of the scrap material included in the transaction, including the weight of the scrap material and the amount paid to the seller.(a.1) Additional requirements for catalytic converters.--A scrap processor and recycling facility operator shall collect the following in addition to the information required under subsection (a) if the transaction includes a catalytic converter:(1) The year, make, model and vehicle identification number of the vehicle from which the catalytic converter was removed.(2) A photograph of the catalytic converter.(3) A photograph of the seller.(b) Tracking the transaction.--A scrap processor and recycling facility operator shall[, when payment is made in cash, develop methods of tracking a transaction that obtains the seller's signature on a receipt for the transaction. The receipt 20250HB0612PN0625 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall include a certification that the seller is the owner or authorized seller of the scrap material.] develop methods of tracking any transaction that requires the scrap processor or recycling facility operator to obtain the information under subsection (a).* * *(c.1) Holding period for transactions involving a catalytic converter.--If a transaction between a scrap processor and recycling facility operator and a seller includes a catalytic converter, in addition to the requirements under subsection (c), the following shall apply:(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), the scrap processor or recycling facility operator shall withhold payment to the seller for 48 hours.(2) If a hold is in place under subsection (c), the scrap processor or recycling facility operator shall withhold payment until the hold is lifted by law enforcement or a magisterial district judge under subsection (c).(3) During a holding period under subsection (c) or this subsection, the scrap processor or recycling facility operator shall keep the catalytic converter intact and safe from alteration, damage or commingling and shall place an identifying tag or other suitable identification upon the scrap metal.* * *(e) Penalties.--A scrap processor or recycling facility operator that fails to collect the information required by subsection (a.1) is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than $5,000.20250HB0612PN0625 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 7. Penalties.(a) Scrap processor and recycling facility operator penalties.--Except as provided under [section] sections 3(e) and 6.2(g), a scrap processor and recycling facility operator who violates this act commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of up to $2,500. A second or subsequent violation shall be classified as a misdemeanor of the third degree.* * *(c) Catalytic converter penalties.--A person who intentionally possesses a detached catalytic converter that is not affiliated with a commercial account with proper justification commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0612PN0625 - 4 - 1234567891011121314